Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Data requests to school districts. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "school district" means an independent, common, or special school district, as defined in section 120A.05, or a cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (b) The provisions in this subdivision apply to a request made to a school district to inspect or receive copies of public government data pursuant to subdivision 3. The provisions in this subdivision are in addition to those contained in subdivision 3, except that when the provisions of this subdivision conflict with those of subdivision 3, this subdivision prevails. This subdivision does not apply to a request made by a data subject under section 13.04. new text end new text begin (c) In addition to any other fees or charges allowable under this chapter, if a requesting person fails to appear within 30 calendar days to inspect the requested data, the responsible authority may require the requesting person to pay the costs authorized to be charged under subdivision 3, paragraph (c), plus the cost of employee time spent separating public from not public data. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to data requests made on or after that date. new text end